Utah statutes.
76-5-103.   Aggravated assault.

(1)  A person commits aggravated assault if the person commits assault as defined in Section 76-5-102 and uses:

(a)  a dangerous weapon as defined in Section 76-1-601; or

(b)  other means or force likely to produce death or serious bodily injury.

(2) (a)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a third degree felony, except under Subsection (2)(b).

(b)  A violation of Subsection (1) that results in serious bodily injury is a second degree felony.



Amended by Chapter 193, 2010 General Session

